Ohio, session 136, HB821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.079 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.079. The legendary and beloved amphibious creature known as the Loveland Frog, or Loveland Frogman, first reported in the 1950s and said to inhabit the banks of the Little Miami river near Loveland, Ohio, described as a frog-like, bipedal creature standing approximately four feet tall, which has inspired books, documentaries, local festivals, artwork, merchandise, local tourism, and cryptid enthusiasts and researchers, and has contributed to the local economy, creative culture, and unique cultural identity and oral history of this state, is adopted as the official state cryptid.